Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-16] Prohibition
of nonsubstantive requirements. (a) If a voter's mistake or
omission in the completion of a document under this chapter does not prevent
determining whether a covered voter is eligible to vote, the mistake or
omission shall not invalidate the document. Failure to satisfy a
nonsubstantive requirement, such as using paper or envelopes of a specified
size or weight, shall not invalidate a document submitted under this chapter.
In a write-in ballot authorized by this chapter if the intention of the voter
is discernible under this State's uniform definition of what constitutes a
vote, an abbreviation, misspelling, or other minor variation in the form of the
name of a candidate or a political party shall be accepted as a valid vote.

(b) Notarization is
not required for the execution of a document under this chapter. An
authentication, other than the declaration on the federal postcard application
and federal write-in absentee ballot, shall not be required for execution of a
document under this chapter. The declaration and any information in the
declaration may be compared with information on file to ascertain the validity
of the document. [L 2012, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next